Louisiana, session 2026, HB375.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Limitation of liability; operators of streetcars; trackless street or trolley
cars; regional transit entity; presumption
A. No operator of a streetcar or trackless street or trolley car shall be liable
for any loss or damage to an operator of a motor vehicle unless the operator of the
streetcar or trackless street or trolley car acted intentionally or negligently.
B. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a streetcar or trackless street
or trolley car is not defective and that the regional transit entity, as defined by R.S.
48:1501(G)(2), and the operator of the streetcar or trackless street or trolley car did
not act negligently.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1090 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 375